Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Patrol Officers in Certain Counties Having Two Judicial Districts, Wherein Certain Highways Intersect, or Bordering on Pearl River

§ 45-7-21.
Employment of patrol officers.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi having two (2) judicial districts and an assessed valuation of property for ad valorem taxation in excess of Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00), according to the last completed assessment for taxation is authorized to employ, in its discretion, not exceeding nine (9) persons whose duty it shall be to patrol the roads of the county and to enforce the road and motor vehicle laws.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi wherein Interstate Highway 55 and State Highway 22 intersect and which is also traversed in whole or part by U. S. Highways 49 and 51, and State Highways 16, 17, 43 and the Natchez Trace, and also containing a part of a public lake or reservoir in excess of thirty thousand (30,000) acres, is authorized to employ, in its discretion, not exceeding seven (7) persons whose duty it shall be to patrol the roads of the county and to enforce the road and motor vehicle laws.

The board of supervisors of any Class 1 county bordering on the east side of Pearl River, and wherein are located five (5) incorporated municipalities, may employ one (1) patrol officer for the supervisors district wherein are located the two (2) incorporated municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8063-01, 8063-04; Laws, 1956, ch. 196, §§ 1, 4; Laws, 1960, ch. 207; Laws, 1964, ch. 285, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 291, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 492, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 395, eff from and after Oct 1, 1980.

§ 45-7-23.
Duties of patrol officers; uniforms.

Patrol officers employed pursuant to Section 45-7-21 are authorized to do, in the performance of their duties, all acts authorized to be done by the sheriff, constable, or any peace officer. Said patrol officers, in addition to their duties as peace officers, shall note the condition of the roads and bridges of the county and make report thereof to the board of supervisors as may be required by said board.

Said patrol officers shall not have the power and authority to enforce the traffic laws, rules and regulations of this state, or any related laws upon any highway of the state highway system, unless and until they have been authorized and empowered to enforce such laws and to aid and assist in the enforcement thereof by the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner of public safety may grant or withhold such authority to the patrolmen of each individual county in his discretion, and may provide and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations under which the patrol officers to whom such authority has been granted shall act in enforcing such laws.

In the performance of their official duties, such patrol officers shall have the power and authority to wear uniforms, but they shall not wear the same uniforms as are worn by members of the highway safety patrol of Mississippi, nor shall they wear uniforms substantially identical thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063-02; Laws, 1956, ch. 196, § 2.

§ 45-7-25.
Radio equipment.

The board of supervisors is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to acquire radio transmitting and receiving equipment for use by said patrol officers in the performance of their duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063-03; Laws, 1956, ch. 196, § 3.

§ 45-7-27.
Compensation of patrol officers; transportation; bond.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2), the board of supervisors of any such county may compensate the county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per month for any one (1) county; in no case shall any one (1) patrol officer receive compensation in excess of Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) per month. In addition to such compensation, the board of supervisors may furnish said patrol officers with means of transportation or reimburse them for their actual and proven transportation expenses. Such compensation and transportation expenses shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Mississippi Sound, and having two (2) judicial districts and an assessed valuation of property for ad valorem taxation in excess of Two Hundred Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00) according to the last completed assessment for taxation, may, in its discretion, compensate each such officer in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the west side of the Pearl River, and having two (2) judicial districts and an assessed valuation of property for ad valorem taxation in excess of Two Hundred Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00), according to the last completed assessment for taxation, may, in its discretion, compensate each such officer in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any Class 1 county bordering on the east side of Pearl River, and wherein are located five (5) incorporated municipalities, may compensate the patrol officer employed for the supervisors district wherein are located two (2) incorporated municipalities in an amount not in excess of Four Hundred Fifty Dollars ($450.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the State of Alabama and the Mississippi Sound and having an assessed valuation of property for ad valorem taxation in excess of Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) according to the last completed assessment for taxation may, in its discretion, compensate each such officer in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the west side of the Pearl River, and wherein are located four (4) incorporated municipalities, may, in its discretion, compensate each such officer in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month.

Each county patrol officer shall, prior to entering upon the duties of his office, give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). The premium for such bond shall be paid from the general fund of such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063-04; Laws, 1956, ch. 196, § 4; Laws, 1960, ch. 207; Laws, 1964, ch. 285, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 291, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 492, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 505; Laws, 1976, ch. 326; Laws, 1978, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 503; Laws, 1980, ch. 557, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 415; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 31; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 39; Laws, 1988, ch. 500; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 45-7-29.
Powers to be additional and supplemental.

The power and authority granted in Sections 45-7-21 through 45-7-27 shall be additional and supplemental to the power and authority of Sections 45-7-1 through 45-7-5.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 196, § 5.